Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2458.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 TLSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js S.F. 2458 DIVISION I 1 PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING POINTS 2 Section 1. Section 29C.9, subsection 10, Code 2026, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 10. The commission shall , if agreed to by a two-thirds 5 majority of the commission and a two-thirds majority of the 6 joint 911 service board, be responsible for the emergency 7 telephone system activities of a joint 911 service board if 8 substituted for a joint 911 service board pursuant to section 9 34A.3, subsection 4 required under chapter 34A . 10 Sec. 2. Section 29C.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 12. Each local emergency management 13 commission, in addition to duties under this chapter and 14 chapter 34A, shall annually submit to the department the 15 following, which the department shall publish on its internet 16 site: 17 a. A five-year plan identifying anticipated 911 service 18 infrastructure needs, upgrades, and improvements. 19 b. An inventory including all of the following: 20 (1) All agency full-time equivalent positions and 21 associated costs. 22 (2) All equipment owned or used by the agency and associated 23 costs. 24 (3) All structures owned or used by the agency and 25 associated costs. 26 (4) All equipment owned by public safety agencies 27 located within the commissionâs jurisdiction, including law 28 enforcement, fire protection, emergency medical services, and 29 the sheriff. 30 Sec. 3. Section 34A.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 31 following new subsection: 32 NEW SUBSECTION . 13A. âLocal emergency management commissionâ 33 means a local emergency management commission established under 34 section 29C.9, acting pursuant to this chapter. 35 -1- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 1/ 18 S.F. 2458 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 34A.2B Public safety answering points 1 ââ accessing criminal justice information. 2 A public safety answering point that accesses criminal 3 justice information shall comply with the security policy 4 of the federal bureau of investigationâs criminal justice 5 information services and any requirements imposed by the Iowa 6 department of public safety. 7 Sec. 5. Section 34A.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 34A.3 Joint 911 service board Local emergency management 10 commission ââ 911 service plan ââ implementation ââ waivers . 11 1. Joint 911 service boards Local emergency management 12 commissions ââ plans. 13 a. The board of supervisors of each county shall maintain a 14 joint 911 service board. 15 (1) Each political subdivision of the state having a public 16 safety agency serving territory within the county and each 17 local emergency management agency as defined in section 29C.2 18 operating within the area is entitled to voting membership on 19 the joint 911 service board. For the purposes of this section , 20 a township that operates a volunteer fire department providing 21 fire protection services to the township, or a city which 22 provides fire protection services through the operation of a 23 volunteer fire department not financed through city government, 24 shall be considered a political subdivision of the state 25 having a public safety agency serving territory within the 26 county. Each private safety agency operating within the area 27 is entitled to nonvoting membership on the board. 28 (2) A township that does not operate its own public safety 29 agency, but contracts for the provision of public safety 30 services, is not entitled to membership on the joint 911 31 service board, but its contractor is entitled to membership 32 according to the contractorâs status as a public or private 33 safety agency. 34 (3) The sheriff of each county, or the sheriffâs designee, 35 -2- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 2/ 18 S.F. 2458 is entitled to voting membership on the joint 911 service 1 board. 2 (4) The chief of police of each city operating a public 3 safety answering point, or the chief of policeâs designee, is 4 entitled to voting membership on the joint 911 service board of 5 the county where the city is located. 6 b. a. (1) The joint 911 service board local emergency 7 management commission shall maintain a 911 service plan 8 encompassing at minimum the entire county , unless an exemption 9 is granted by the program manager permitting a smaller 10 911 service area . Except as otherwise authorized in this 11 paragraph, not more than one public safety answering point 12 shall provide 911 service within a county. This subsection 13 does not apply to a public safety answering point operated 14 by the national guard, any branch of the armed forces of the 15 United States, or the department of public safety. 16 (2) If a city extends into more than one county, the city, 17 the counties, and the local emergency management commissions 18 serving the city shall enter into an agreement to determine 19 how 911 calls originating from the city are allocated to the 20 public safety answering points in the counties where the city 21 is located. 22 b. Public safety answering points providing 911 23 service within the same county shall at all times maintain 24 communication capabilities with each other and with all public 25 safety agencies within the county, including those providing 26 fire protection, law enforcement, emergency medical services, 27 and the sheriff. 28 (1) The program manager may grant a discretionary exemption 29 from the single county minimum service area requirement 30 based upon a joint 911 service boardâs or other 911 service 31 plan operating authorityâs presentation of evidence which 32 supports the requested exemption if the program manager finds 33 that local conditions make adherence to the minimum standard 34 unreasonable or technically infeasible and that the purposes 35 -3- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 3/ 18 S.F. 2458 of this chapter would be furthered by granting an exemption. 1 The minimum size requirement is intended to prevent unnecessary 2 duplication of public safety answering points and minimize 3 other administrative, personnel, and equipment expenses. 4 (2) The program manager may order the inclusion of a 5 specific territory not serviced by surrounding 911 service plan 6 areas in an adjoining 911 service plan area upon request of the 7 joint 911 service board representing the territory to avoid 8 the creation by exclusion of a territory smaller than a single 9 county. 10 c. The A 911 service plan operating authority shall submit 11 proposed changes to the plan to all of the following: 12 (1) The program manager. 13 (2) Public and private safety agencies in the 911 service 14 area. 15 (3) Local exchange service providers affected by the 911 16 service plan. 17 2. Compliance waivers available in limited circumstances. 18 a. The program manager may extend the time period for plan 19 implementation by issuing a compliance waiver. 20 b. The compliance waiver shall be based upon a joint 21 911 service boardâs local emergency management commissionâs 22 presentation of evidence which that supports an extension 23 if the program manager finds that local conditions make 24 implementation financially unreasonable or technically 25 infeasible by the originally scheduled plan of implementation. 26 c. The compliance waiver shall be for a set period of time, 27 and subject to review and renewal or denial of renewal upon its 28 expiration. 29 d. The waiver may cover all or a portion of a 911 service 30 planâs 911 service area to facilitate phased implementation 31 when possible. 32 e. The granting of a compliance waiver does not create 33 a presumption that the identical or similar waiver will be 34 extended in the future. 35 -4- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 4/ 18 S.F. 2458 f. Consideration of compliance waivers shall be on a 1 case-by-case basis. 2 3. Chapter 28E agreement ââ alternative to joint 911 service 3 board. 4 a. A legal entity created pursuant to chapter 28E by a 5 county or counties, other political divisions, and public or 6 private agencies to jointly plan, implement, and operate a 7 countywide, or larger, 911 service system may be substituted 8 for the joint 911 service board required under subsection 1 . 9 An alternative legal entity created pursuant to chapter 28E as 10 a substitute for a joint 911 service board, as permitted by 11 this subsection , may be created by either: 12 (1) Agreement of the parties entitled to voting membership 13 on a joint 911 service board. 14 (2) Agreement of the members of a joint 911 service board. 15 b. An alternative chapter 28E entity has all of the powers 16 of a joint 911 service board and any additional powers granted 17 by the agreement. As used in this chapter , âjoint 911 service 18 boardâ includes an alternative chapter 28E entity created for 19 that purpose, except as specifically limited by the chapter 28E 20 agreement or unless clearly provided otherwise in this chapter . 21 A chapter 28E agreement related to 911 service shall permit 22 the participation of a private safety agency or other persons 23 allowed to participate in a joint 911 service board, but the 24 terms, scope, and conditions of participation are subject to 25 the chapter 28E agreement. 26 4. Local emergency management commission ââ alternative to 27 911 service board. 28 a. Subject to section 29C.9, subsection 10 , a local 29 emergency management commission may be substituted for the 30 joint 911 service board required under subsection 1 by the 31 board of supervisors of the county in which the joint 911 32 service board is maintained. 33 b. A commission shall have all of the powers of a joint 911 34 service board if a commission is substituted for the joint 911 35 -5- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 5/ 18 S.F. 2458 service board pursuant to paragraph âaâ . 1 c. As used in this chapter , âjoint 911 service boardâ 2 includes a commission if a commission is substituted for the 3 joint 911 service board pursuant to paragraph âaâ . 4 5. Participation in joint 911 service board required. A 5 political subdivision having a public or private safety agency 6 within its territory or jurisdiction shall participate in a 7 joint 911 service board and cooperate in maintaining the 911 8 service plan. 9 3. Consolidation. 10 a. On or before December 31, 2026, each joint 911 service 11 board existing on the effective date of this Act shall submit 12 to the department of homeland security and emergency management 13 a letter of intent to consolidate all public safety answering 14 points within the county to one and transfer all funds, 15 debts, contract rights, and obligations to the local emergency 16 management commission by December 31, 2031. On or before 17 December 31, 2027, each county shall submit to the department a 18 plan on how the county will reform or consolidate within the 19 required time frame. This paragraph is repealed on January 1, 20 2033. 21 b. An employee employed by a public safety answering point 22 whose employment is discontinued due to consolidation under 23 this subsection shall be given a hiring preference for one 24 year following the employeeâs last date of employment with the 25 public safety answering point for any similar position with 26 another public safety answering point in Iowa. This paragraph 27 shall not be construed to supersede any collective bargaining 28 agreements. This paragraph is repealed on January 1, 2033. 29 c. A county that contains more than one public safety 30 answering point after December 31, 2031, shall be allocated 31 one dollar out of the one dollar and twenty cent surcharge 32 implemented pursuant to section 34A.7A. The remaining 33 statutory allocation of twenty cents shall be evenly 34 distributed to all other counties not exceeding one public 35 -6- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 6/ 18 S.F. 2458 service answering point within the county. 1 d. Except for transfer requirements from joint 911 service 2 boards existing on the effective date of this Act to local 3 emergency management commissions, this subsection does not 4 apply to a county with only one public safety answering point 5 on July 1, 2026, or to any public safety answering points 6 operated by the national guard, any branch of the armed forces 7 of the United States, or the department of public safety. 8 e. Each joint 911 service board existing on the effective 9 date of this Act shall transfer all funds, debts, contract 10 rights, and obligations to the local emergency management 11 commission no later December 31, 2031. This paragraph is 12 repealed on January 1, 2033. 13 Sec. 6. Section 34A.7, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 14 is amended to read as follows: 15 When a 911 service plan is implemented, the costs of 16 providing 911 service within a 911 service area are the 17 responsibility of the joint 911 service board local emergency 18 management commission and the member political subdivisions. 19 Costs in excess of the amount raised by imposition of the 911 20 service surcharge provided for under subsection 1 shall be 21 paid by the joint 911 service board local emergency management 22 commission from such revenue sources allocated among the 23 member political subdivisions as determined by the joint 911 24 service board local emergency management commission . Funding 25 is not limited to the surcharge, and surcharge revenues may 26 be supplemented by other permissible local and state revenue 27 sources. A joint 911 service board local emergency management 28 commission shall not commit a political subdivision to 29 appropriate property tax revenues to fund a 911 service plan 30 without the consent of the political subdivision. A joint 911 31 service board local emergency management commission may approve 32 a 911 service plan, including a funding formula requiring 33 appropriations by participating political subdivisions, subject 34 to the approval of the funding formula by each political 35 -7- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 7/ 18 S.F. 2458 subdivision. However, a political subdivision may agree in 1 advance to appropriate property tax revenues or other moneys 2 according to a formula or plan developed by an alternative 3 chapter 28E entity. Property tax revenues appropriated by a 4 political subdivision under the funding formula for the purpose 5 of supporting public safety answering point operations shall 6 be paid only to the local emergency management commission that 7 operates the primary public safety answering point serving the 8 political subdivision. 9 Sec. 7. Section 34A.7, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2026, 10 is amended to read as follows: 11 a. To encourage local implementation of 911 service, one 12 source of funding for 911 emergency communication systems shall 13 come from a surcharge per month, per access line on each access 14 line subscriber, of one dollar and twenty cents . 15 Sec. 8. Section 34A.7A, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 16 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 a. The director shall adopt by rule a monthly surcharge 18 of one dollar and twenty cents to be imposed on each 19 originating service number provided in this state. The 20 surcharge shall be imposed uniformly on a statewide basis 21 and simultaneously on all originating service numbers as 22 provided by rule of the director. The surcharge shall not be 23 imposed on wire-line-based communications or prepaid wireless 24 telecommunications service. 25 Sec. 9. Section 34A.7A, subsection 5, paragraph c, Code 26 2026, is amended to read as follows: 27 c. A county joint 911 service board which that fails to 28 submit expenses and costs pursuant to the methodology developed 29 pursuant to paragraph âaâ by March 31 of each year shall be 30 allocated sixty-five cents out of the one dollar and twenty 31 cent 911 emergency communications service surcharge until March 32 31 of the following year. Remaining funds shall be held in the 33 carryover operating surplus fund until the expenses and cost 34 report is submitted by the county joint 911 service board. If 35 -8- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 8/ 18 S.F. 2458 the county joint 911 service board submits the expense and cost 1 report before March 30 of the following year, the set aside 2 funds shall be provided to the county joint 911 service board. 3 If the county joint 911 service board fails to submit the 4 expense and cost report within one year, funds shall revert to 5 the carryover operating surplus fund and be used in accordance 6 with subsection 2 , paragraph âfâ . 7 Sec. 10. Section 34A.11, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 34A.11 Communications ââ single point-of-contact. 10 1. The joint 911 service board local emergency management 11 commission in each 911 service area shall designate a person 12 to serve as a single point-of-contact to facilitate the 13 communication of needs, issues, or concerns regarding emergency 14 communications, interoperability, and other matters applicable 15 to emergency 911 communications and migration to the next 16 generation 911 network. The person designated as the single 17 point-of-contact shall be responsible for facilitating the 18 communication of such needs, issues, or concerns between 19 public or private safety agencies within the service area, 20 the 911 program manager, the 911 communications council, the 21 statewide interoperable communications system board established 22 in section 80.28 , and any other person, entity, or agency the 23 person deems necessary or appropriate. The person designated 24 shall also be responsible for responding to surveys or requests 25 for information applicable to the service area received from a 26 federal, state, or local agency, entity, or board. 27 2. In the event a joint 911 service board local 28 emergency management commission fails to designate a single 29 point-of-contact by November 1, 2013 2026 , the chairperson 30 of the joint 911 service board county sheriff shall serve in 31 that capacity. The 911 service board shall submit the name 32 and contact information for the person designated as the 33 single point-of-contact to the 911 program manager by January 34 1 annually. 35 -9- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 9/ 18 S.F. 2458 3. The provisions of this section shall be equally 1 applicable to an alternative legal entity created pursuant to 2 chapter 28E if such an entity is established as an alternative 3 to a joint 911 service board as provided in section 34A.3 . 4 If such an entity is established, the governing body of 5 that entity shall designate the single point-of-contact for 6 the entity, and the chairperson or representative official 7 of the governing body shall serve in the event a single 8 point-of-contact is not designated. 9 Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 10 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 11 DIVISION II 12 CONFORMING CHANGES 13 Sec. 12. Section 16.161, Code 2026, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 16.161 Authority to issue 911 program bonds and notes. 16 1. The authority shall assist the program manager, 17 appointed pursuant to section 34A.2A , as provided in chapter 18 34A, subchapter II , and the authority shall have all of the 19 powers delegated to it by a joint 911 service board local 20 emergency management commission or the department of public 21 defense in a chapter 28E agreement with respect to the issuance 22 and securing of bonds or notes and the carrying out of the 23 purposes of chapter 34A . 24 2. The authority shall provide a mechanism for the 25 pooling of funds of two or more joint 911 service boards 26 local emergency management commissions to be used for the 27 joint purchasing of necessary equipment and reimbursement of 28 land-line and wireless service providersâ costs for upgrades 29 necessary to provide 911 service. When two or more joint 911 30 service boards local emergency management commissions have 31 agreed to pool funds for the purpose of purchasing necessary 32 equipment to be used in providing 911 service, the authority 33 shall issue bonds and notes as provided in sections 34A.20 34 through 34A.22 . 35 -10- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 10/ 18 S.F. 2458 Sec. 13. Section 34A.2, subsection 5, paragraph d, 1 subparagraph (1), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 A statement of estimated costs to be incurred by the joint 4 911 service board local emergency management commission or the 5 department of public safety, including separate estimates of 6 the following: 7 Sec. 14. Section 34A.7, subsection 1, paragraph b, 8 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9 (1) The program manager shall notify a local exchange 10 service provider scheduled to provide exchange access line 11 service to a 911 service area that implementation of a 911 12 service plan has been approved by the joint 911 service board 13 local emergency management commission and that collection of 14 the surcharge is to begin within sixty days. 15 Sec. 15. Section 34A.7, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 16 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 a. The surcharge shall be collected as part of the access 18 line service providerâs periodic billing to a subscriber. In 19 compensation for the costs of billing and collection, the local 20 exchange service provider may retain one percent of the gross 21 surcharges collected. If the compensation is insufficient to 22 fully recover a local exchange service providerâs costs for 23 billing and collection of the surcharge, the deficiency shall 24 be included in the local exchange service providerâs costs for 25 ratemaking purposes to the extent it is reasonable and just 26 under section 476.6 . The surcharge shall be remitted to the 27 joint 911 service board local emergency management commission 28 for deposit into the 911 service fund quarterly by the local 29 exchange service provider. The total amount for multiple 30 exchanges may be combined. 31 Sec. 16. Section 34A.7, subsection 2, paragraph c, 32 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 33 follows: 34 The joint 911 service board local emergency management 35 -11- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 11/ 18 S.F. 2458 commission may request, not more than once each quarter, the 1 following information from the local exchange service provider: 2 Sec. 17. Section 34A.7, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 4. 911 service fund. Each joint 911 service board local 5 emergency management commission shall establish and maintain 6 as a separate account a 911 service fund. Any funds remaining 7 in the account at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert 8 to the general funds of the member political subdivisions, 9 except as provided in subsection 5 , but shall remain in the 911 10 service fund. Moneys in a 911 service fund may only be used 11 for nonrecurring and recurring costs of the 911 service plan 12 as approved by the program manager, as those terms are defined 13 by section 34A.2 . 14 Sec. 18. Section 34A.7, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 15 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 a. Moneys deposited in a 911 service fund shall be used for 17 the repayment of any bonds issued for the benefit of or loan 18 made to the joint 911 service board local emergency management 19 commission pursuant to sections 34A.20 through 34A.22 , and as 20 long as any such bond or loan remains unpaid the surcharge 21 shall not be reduced or eliminated. Moneys deposited in the 22 fund shall be subject to such terms and conditions as may be 23 contained in the relevant bond documents, trust indenture, 24 resolution, loan agreement, or other instrument pursuant to 25 which bonds are issued or a loan is made, without regard to any 26 limitation otherwise provided by law. 27 Sec. 19. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph b, 28 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 (1) The program manager shall allocate to each joint 911 30 service board local emergency management commission and to the 31 department of public safety a minimum of one thousand dollars 32 per calendar quarter for each public safety answering point 33 within the service area of the department of public safety or 34 joint 911 service board local emergency management commission . 35 -12- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 12/ 18 S.F. 2458 Sec. 20. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (c), Code 2026, is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 (c) Notwithstanding subparagraph divisions (a) and (b), the 4 minimum amount allocated to each joint 911 service board local 5 emergency management commission and to the department of public 6 safety shall be no less than one thousand dollars for each 7 public safety answering point within the service area of the 8 department of public safety or joint 911 service board local 9 emergency management commission . 10 Sec. 21. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph d, 11 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 (2) The program manager may also provide grants to joint 13 911 service boards local emergency management commissions and 14 the department of public safety for the purpose of developing 15 and maintaining GIS data to be used in support of the next 16 generation 911 network. The program manager shall provide 17 guidelines, application forms, and notice of the availability 18 of such grants on the departmentâs internet site. 19 Sec. 22. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code 20 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 g. The director, in consultation with the program manager 22 and the 911 communications council, shall adopt rules pursuant 23 to chapter 17A governing the distribution of the surcharge 24 collected and distributed pursuant to this subsection . The 25 rules shall include provisions that all joint 911 service 26 boards local emergency management commissions and the 27 department of public safety which that answer or service 28 wireless 911 calls are eligible to receive an equitable portion 29 of the receipts. 30 Sec. 23. Section 34A.7A, subsection 5, paragraphs a and c, 31 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 32 a. The program manager, in consultation with the 911 33 communications council and the auditor of state, shall 34 establish a methodology for determining and collecting public 35 -13- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 13/ 18 S.F. 2458 safety answering point cost and expense data through the 1 county joint 911 service boards local emergency management 2 commissions . The methodology shall include the collection of 3 data for direct costs and expenses related to the operation 4 of a public safety answering point and account for the extent 5 to which identified costs and expenses are compensated for 6 or addressed through 911 surcharges versus other sources of 7 funding. 8 c. A county joint 911 service board which local emergency 9 management commission that fails to submit expenses and costs 10 pursuant to the methodology developed pursuant to paragraph âaâ 11 by March 31 of each year shall be allocated sixty-five cents 12 out of the one dollar 911 emergency communications service 13 surcharge until March 31 of the following year. Remaining 14 funds shall be held in the carryover operating surplus 15 fund until the expenses and cost report is submitted by the 16 county joint 911 service board local emergency management 17 commission . If the county joint 911 service board local 18 emergency management commission submits the expense and cost 19 report before March 30 of the following year, the set aside 20 funds shall be provided to the county joint 911 service board 21 local emergency management commission . If the county joint 911 22 service board local emergency management commission fails to 23 submit the expense and cost report within one year, funds shall 24 revert to the carryover operating surplus fund and be used in 25 accordance with subsection 2 , paragraph âfâ . 26 Sec. 24. Section 34A.8, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 27 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 b. The director, program manager, joint 911 service board, 29 local emergency management commission established pursuant 30 to section 29C.9 , the designated next generation 911 network 31 service provider, and the public safety answering point, and 32 their agents, employees, and assigns , shall use local exchange 33 service information provided by the local exchange service 34 provider solely for the purposes of providing 911 emergency 35 -14- LSB 5899SV (4) 91 sb/js 14/ 18 S.F. 2458 telephone service or providing related mass notification and 1 emergency messaging services as described in section 29C.17A 2 utilizing only the subscriberâs information, and local exchange 3 service information shall otherwise be kept confidential. 4 A person who violates this paragraph is guilty of a simple 5 misdemeanor. 6 Sec. 25. Section 34A.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 34A.12 Delivery of 911 calls ââ reimbursement. 9 The program manager may request reimbursement from each 10 joint 911 service board local emergency management commission 11 for reasonable costs under section 34A.7A related to the 12 delivery of 911 call traffic to public safety answering 13 points. Upon request, each joint 911 service board local 14 emergency management commission shall reimburse the department 15 of homeland security and emergency management for such costs 16 within thirty days. 17 Sec. 26. Section 34A.21, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 18 2026, is amended to read as follows: 19 c. The amounts on deposit in the 911 service fund of a 20 joint 911 service board local emergency management commission , 21 including , but not limited to revenues from a local option 911 22 service surcharge. 23 Sec. 27. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 24 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 25